Utah statutes.
70A-4-102.   Applicability.
(1)  To the extent that items within this chapter are also within the scope of
Title 70A, Chapters 3 and 8, they are subject to  those chapters.  If there is
a conflict, this chapter governs Title 70A, Chapter 3 and Title 70A, Chapter 8
governs this chapter.
(2)  The liability of a bank for action or nonaction with respect to an item
handled by it for purposes of presentment, payment, or collection is governed
by the law of the place where the bank is located.  In the case of action or
nonaction by or at a branch or separate office of a bank, its liability is
governed by the law of the place where the branch or separate office is
located.
